District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.11

Continuation of rules and regulations.

All rulemaking and regulations for the administration of the District Medicaid Program and D.C. Health Care Alliance Program, issued under appropriate authority, shall continue in full force and effect.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 12, 55 DCR 216